Illinois, session 104th, HB1644.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Criminal Code of 2012 is amended by 5changing Section 12-3.3 as follows: 6    (720 ILCS 5/12-3.3)7    Sec. 12-3.3. Aggravated domestic battery. 8    (a) A person who, in committing a domestic battery, 9knowingly causes great bodily harm, or permanent disability or 10disfigurement commits aggravated domestic battery.11    (a-5) A person who, in committing a domestic battery, 12strangles another individual commits aggravated domestic 13battery. For the purposes of this subsection (a-5), "strangle" 14means intentionally impeding the normal breathing or 15circulation of the blood of an individual by applying pressure 16on the throat or neck of that individual or by blocking the 17nose or mouth of that individual.18    (a-10) A person who, in committing a domestic battery, 19other than by discharge of a firearm, knows the individual 20battered to be a person 60 years of age or older commits 21aggravated domestic battery. 22    (b) Sentence. Aggravated domestic battery is a Class 2 23felony. Any order of probation or conditional discharge   HB1644- 2 -LRB104 07608 RLC 17652 b1entered following a conviction for an offense under this 2Section must include, in addition to any other condition of 3probation or conditional discharge, a condition that the 4offender serve a mandatory term of imprisonment of not less 5than 60 consecutive days. A person convicted of a second or 6subsequent violation of this Section must be sentenced to a 7mandatory term of imprisonment of not less than 3 years and not 8more than 7 years or an extended term of imprisonment of not 9less than 7 years and not more than 14 years.10    (c) Upon conviction of aggravated domestic battery, the 11court shall advise the defendant orally or in writing, 12substantially as follows: "An individual convicted of 13aggravated domestic battery may be subject to federal criminal 14penalties for possessing, transporting, shipping, or receiving 15any firearm or ammunition in violation of the federal Gun 16Control Act of 1968 (18 U.S.C. 922(g)(8) and (9))." A notation 17shall be made in the court file that the admonition was given. 18(Source: P.A. 96-287, eff. 8-11-09; 96-363, eff. 8-13-09; 1996-1000, eff. 7-2-10; 96-1551, eff. 7-1-11.)